Hawaii statutes.
[§482P-3] Transfer, assignment, and
license. (a) A right recognized by this chapter shall be freely
transferable, assignable, and licensable, in whole or in part, by contract or
inter vivos transfer. This right shall not expire upon the death of the individual
or personality, but shall be owned and enforceable by the following successors,
heirs, or other transferees of living or deceased individuals or personalities:

(1) Except where a right recognized by this chapter
was transferred or assigned before the deceased personality's death by means of
any contract or trust instrument, a right recognized by this section shall be
owned by the person entitled to the right under the deceased individual's or
personality's last will and testament or, if none, then by the beneficiaries or
heirs under the laws of intestate succession applicable to interests in
intangible personal property generally of the individual's or personality's
domicile, regardless of whether the law of the domicile of the deceased
individual or personality, at the time of death, or thereafter, recognizes a
similar or identical property right; or

(2) If the deceased individual or personality
transferred or assigned any interest in a right recognized by this chapter
during the individual's or personality's life by means of any contract or trust
instrument, then the interest so transferred or assigned shall be held as
follows:

(A) If the transferred or assigned interest
was held in trust, in accordance with the terms of the trust;

(B) If the transferred or assigned interest
is subject to a cotenancy with any survivorship provisions or payable-on-death
provisions, in accordance with those provisions;

(C) If the transferred or assigned interest
is subject to any contract, including without limitation an exclusive license,
assignment, or a community property agreement, in accordance with the terms of
the applicable contract or contracts; or

(D) If the interest has been transferred or
assigned to a third person in a form that is not addressed in this section, by
the individual or personality, or the successor, heir, or other valid
transferee of the living or deceased individual or personality, then the
interest may be transferred, assigned, or licensed by that third person, in
whole or in part, by any otherwise permissible form of inter vivos or
testamentary transfer or, if none is applicable, under the laws of intestate
succession applicable to interests in intangible personal property of the third
person's domicile, regardless of whether the law of the domicile of the
deceased third party, at the time of death, or thereafter, recognizes a similar
or identical property right.

(b) A property right exists whether or not
those rights were commercially exploited by or under the authority of the individual
or the personality, or the individual's or personality's successors or
transferees, during the individual's or the personality's lifetime. [L Sp 2009,
c 28, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next